Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.085

Additional powers and duties.

In addition to its other powers granted under this chapter, the commission has authority and power to:

(1) Contract for services as it deems necessary in order to carry out its duties and responsibilities;

(2) Cooperate with and secure the cooperation of any department, agency, or instrumentality in state, county, and city government, and other commissions affected by or concerned with the business of the commission;

(3) Select and employ an executive director, and empower the director to perform such duties and responsibilities as the commission may deem necessary;

(4) Issue subpoenas and statements of charges, and administer oaths in connection with investigations, hearings, or other proceedings held under this chapter, or designate individuals to do so;

(5) Employ such staff as necessary for the implementation and enforcement of this chapter;

(6) Take or cause to be taken depositions and other discovery procedures as needed in investigations, hearings, and other proceedings held under this chapter;

(7) Enter into contracts for professional services determined by the commission to be necessary for adequate enforcement of this chapter; and

(8) Exercise lawful actions necessary to enable the commission to fully and adequately perform its duties and to exercise the lawful powers granted to the commission.

[ 2021 c 323 s 7; 2020 c 119 s 1; 2006 c 22 s 1; 2001 c 167 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 22: "This act takes effect January 1, 2007." [ 2006 c 22 s 4.]

Severability—2006 c 22: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2006 c 22 s 5.]